Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB955.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1358.3. Mental health registration plate.(a) Design.--The department shall design a mental health registration plate. The registration plate shall feature the Liberty Bell with a teal and purple ribbon overlay and shall include the phrase "Mental Health Matters" at the bottom.(b) Issuance.--Upon application of a person, accompanied by a fee of $42, which shall be in addition to the registration fee, the department shall issue a mental health registration plate for a motorcycle, a passenger car or a truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds or a 12345678910111213141516171819 motor home . (c) Fees.--Fifteen dollars of each fee received under this section shall be credited to the Mental Health Restricted Account established under section 1905(c.1) (relating to payments to special funds).Section 2. Section 1905 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1905. Payments to special funds.* * *(c.1) Mental Health Restricted Account.--The Mental Health Restricted Account is established in the State Treasury for the purpose of operations of the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline or its successor. The money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Department of Human Services for the purposes of this subsection.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0955PN1084 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617